lexc/farsi.foma
#define elimination ? (->) 0;
define finalEliminate [fin1 | fin2 | fin3 | fin4 | UN | khaPhone | nabMab | chCHE];
define elitRules [finalEliminate | DELIB];
######################################################
###################vowel alteration############################
#define VOWELS ["ئ" | "ء" | ALEFCNTX | VAV | YEH | HEH | EIN | ZWNJ | SPACE];
#define HAMZE ["ئ" | "ء" | "ؤ" | "أ" | "إ"];
#define eHamze [ "ئ" | "ء" ];
#define hzmAlter eHamze (->) [EIN | YEH] || _ BOUNDS _;
#define vavHeh [VAV | HEH] (->) [VAV | HEH] || _ BOUNDS _;
#define vCreation SPACE (->) VOWELS || _ BOUNDS _;
#define vElimiation VOWELS (->) SPACE || _ BOUNDS _;
##define VMED [?* [VOWELS:[0 |SPACE | ZWNJ] | [0 |SPACE | ZWNJ]:VOWELS | HAMZE:YEH-HAMZE | YEH:HAMZE-YEH] ?*]^<2;
#define VMED [?* [VOWELS:0 | 0:VOWELS | VOWELS:VOWELS-VOWELS ] ?*]^<2;
#define vowAltering VOWELS -> VOWELS || _ BOUNDS _;
#define vowAltering hzmAlter .o. vavHeh; # .o. vCreation .o. vElimiation;
######################################################
###################word stress############################
define h1 ALEF+ -> 0 || ALEF _ ;
define h2 AA+ -> 0 || AA _ ;
define h3 BEH+ -> 0 || BEH _ ;
define h4 PEH+ -> 0 || PEH _ ;
define h5 TE+ -> 0 || TE _ ;
define h6 SE+ -> 0 || SE _ ;
define h7 JIM+ -> 0 || JIM _ ;
define h8 CHE+ -> 0 || CHE _ ;
define h9 HE+ -> 0 || HE _ ;
define h10 KHE+ -> 0 || KHE _ ;
define h11 DAL+ -> 0 || DAL _ ;
define h12 ZAL+ -> 0 || ZAL _ ;
define h13 RE+ -> 0 || RE _ ;
define h14 ZE+ -> 0 || ZE _ ;
define h15 ZHE+ -> 0 || ZHE _ ;
define h16 SIN+ -> 0 || SIN _ ;
define h17 SHIN+ -> 0 || SHIN _ ;
define h18 SAD+ -> 0 || SAD _ ;
define h19 ZAD+ -> 0 || ZAD _ ;
define h20 TA+ -> 0 || TA _ ;
define h21 ZA+ -> 0 || ZA _ ;
define h22 EIN+ -> 0 || EIN _ ;
define h23 GHEIN+ -> 0 || GHEIN _ ;
define h24 FE+ -> 0 || FE _ ;
define h25 GHAF+ -> 0 || GHAF _ ;
define h26 KAF+ -> 0 || KAF _ ;
define h27 GAF+ -> 0 || GAF _ ;
define h28 LAM+ -> 0 || LAM _ ;
define h29 MIM+ -> 0 || MIM _ ;
define h30 NOON+ -> 0 || NOON _ ;
define h31 VAV+ -> 0 || VAV _ ;
define h32 HEH+ -> 0 || HEH _ ;
define h33 YEH+ -> 0 || YEH _ ;
####define h33 HAMZE+ -> 0 || HAMZE _ ;
define wordStress h1 .o. h2 .o. h3 .o. h4 .o. h5 .o. h6 .o. h7 .o. h8 .o.
	h9 .o. h10 .o. h11 .o. h12 .o. h13 .o. h14 .o. h15 .o. h16 .o.
	h17 .o. h18 .o. h19 .o. h20 .o. h21 .o. h22 .o. h23 .o. h24 .o.
	h25 .o. h26 .o. h27 .o. h28 .o. h29 .o. h30 .o. h31 .o. h32 .o. h33;

######################################################
#############MINIMUM EDIT DISTANCE##################
define medAlph [ALPHABET | SPACE | ZWNJ];
define MED2 [?* [medAlph:0 | 0:medAlph | medAlph:medAlph-medAlph] ?*];
#define MED2 [?* [?:0|0:?|?:?-?] ?*];
######################################################
#################BORDERS nondeterministic#####################
define BRD [SPACE | ZWNJ | 0];
#define BRD ["^" | "×" | "*"];
#define fborderNonDet [?* [BRD:0 | BRD:BRD-BRD] ?*]*;
#define sborderNonDet [?* [0:BRD | BRD:BRD-BRD] ?*]*;
define fborderNonDet BRD -> BRD;
#define fborderNonDet [?* BRD:BRD ?*]*;
define tborderNonDet [?* [0:BRD | BRD:0 | BRD:BRD-BRD] ?*]*;
#define tborderNonDet [?* BRD:BRD-BRD ?*]*;
define border fborderNonDet | sborderNonDet;
define bb1 0 -> ZWNJ;
define bb2 0 -> SPACE;
#define bordd bb1 .o. bb2 .o. borderNonDet;
define bb3 ZWNJ -> SPACE;
define bb4 ZWNJ -> 0;
define bb5 SPACE -> 0;
define bb6 SPACE -> ZWNJ;
define BB [bb1 | bb2 | bb3 | bb4 | bb5 | bb6];
#define borderNonDet [?* [BRD:0 | 0:BRD | BRD:BRD-BRD] ?*]^4;

define BLOCKBRD ~$[[[SPACE ZWNJ] | [ZWNJ SPACE] | [SPACE SPACE ] | [ZWNJ ZWNJ]]+];
######################################################

#define ALL ALLnouns .o.
#	alefMianji .o.
#	gafMianji .o.
#	EZConst1 .o.
#	EZConst2 .o.
#	EZConst3 .o.
#	yehMianji .o.
#	tafzili .o.
#	refineHA .o.
#	putZWNJ .o.
#	putConcat .o. 
#	putSpace .o.
#	extraZWNJ;
#define iNOUN iLexNoun | iLexHarf .o.
#	shortCopula .o.
#	defHehRefine .o.
#	tafzili .o.
#	roARefine .o.
#	animPlRefine .o.
#	iHaRefine .o.
#	iPLaRefine .o.
#	NNhamRefine .o.
#	iObjCliticRefine .o.
#	hehSpace .o.
#	NNiANDArefine .o.  #distRefine
#	NNiNehBehRefine .o. #for neg infs start with alef
#	optionalAlef .o.
###	iYehAlefMianji .o.
#	iYehMianji .o.
#	EZConst1 .o.
#	EZConst2 .o.
#	EZConst3 .o.
#	removeZWNJ .o.
#	iPutSpace .o.
#	refineZWNJ .o.
#	putConcat .o.
#	iExtraSpace;
#define VERBS chain .o. 
#	presInflInflection .o.
#	#VowelEnding .o.
#	nehRefine .o.
#	behRefine .o.
#	putZWNJ .o.
#	putConcat .o. 
#	putSpace .o.
#	extraZWNJ;
define NN iLexNoun | LexHarf .o.
	NNiNehRefine .o.
	elimHeh .o.
	makeBoth .o.
	joinBoth;
#	NNobjCliticOverlay .o.
#	NNcoverUPoverlay .o.
		#putConcat .o. 
		#extraZWNJ .o.
		#putZWNJ .o.
#	refineZWNJ .o.
	#ZWNJissue .o.
	#SPACEissue .o.
		#iPutSpace;

define iVERBS iChain | iLexVerb .o. # | MTverbs | MTchain .o.
#	iPresInflection1 .o.
#	iPresInflection2 .o.
#	iThirdPerson .o.
#	VBiANDArefine .o.
	VBiNehRefine .o.
	VBiBehRefine .o.
#	VBiOptionalAlef .o.
	VBhamRefine .o.
	#VBiHaRefine .o.
		#VBiPLaRefine .o.
	VBoftRefine .o.
	#refineStress .o.
	VBhehSpace;
				#	putConcat .o. 
				#	zwnjNOTdet .o.
				#	putZWNJ .o.
				#	extraZWNJ .o.
	#refineZWNJ;
				#	spaceNOTdet .o.
				#	iPutSpace .o.
				#	iExtraSpace;
	#formalRemover .o.

#define debugFST(FST, num) [FST.i .o. [?+ @-> ["<" F S T  ": " num ">"] ... ["<" "/" F S T  ": " num ">"] ]].i;
#define debugFST(FST, num) [FST.i .o. [[..] -> ["+" num ] || _ .#.] ].i, ;
define debugFST(FST, num) [FST.i .o. [?+ @-> [ "<" num ":" ] ... [">"] ]].i ;
#define debugFST(FST, num) [ [FST.l FST.i] .o. [?+ @-> [ "<" num ":" ] ... [">"] ]].i ;
#define WORDS ALL | iNOUN | iVERBS .o. aPhone;
define WORDS NN | iVERBS .o. aPhone;
define rawWORDS NN | iVERBS;

define elimSpace [ZWNJ | SPACE] -> 0;

define STANDARD [ALEF SIN TE ALEF NOON DAL ALEF RE DAL];
define HOMOPHONE [ HEH MIM SAD DAL ALEF ];
define AVAEE [AA VAV ALEF YEH YEH];
define VADDING [VAV ALEF KAF HEH ZWNJ ALEF FE ZE ALEF YEH YEH];
define EXPRESSIVE [ BEH YEH ALEF NOON YEH ];
define SPLITTER [TE GHAF TA YEH EIN];
define MED [ KAF FE VAV ];

#define FST7 [elimSpace.i .o. WORDS.i];

		#define FST1 WORDS; # .o. BLOCKBRD; #farsi #combo #med 
		#define FST8 FST1 .o. border.i;
		#define FST9 FST1 .o. tborderNonDet.i;

define brdHandler putConcat .o. 
		extraZWNJ .o.
		putZWNJ .o.
		iPutSpace;


######STANDARD-1-FST########
#define FST1 WORDS .o. brdHandler .o. fborderNonDet .o. refineZWNJ;
##regex debugFST(FST1, STANDARD);
#regex FST1;
######################
######HOMOPHONE-1-FST########
#SHOULD ACTIVATE >>> SPECIAL-EZAFE-CONSTRUCTION IN inoun.lexc line 436 and 437
#define FST2 WORDS .o. brdHandler .o. fborderNonDet .o. refineZWNJ .o. homoPhones;
##regex debugFST(FST2, HOMOPHONE);
#regex FST2;
######################
######AVAEE-1-FST########
#define FST3 WORDS .o. brdHandler .o. elitRules .o. fborderNonDet.i .o. refineZWNJ;
#define elimFormal ["+" RE SIN MIM YEH] -> 0;
#define finalAvaee FST3.i .o. elimFormal;
##regex debugFST(finalAvaee.i, AVAEE);
#regex finalAvaee.i;
######################
######WORD-STRESS#######
#define FST4 WORDS .o. brdHandler .o. fborderNonDet .o. refineZWNJ .o. wordStress.i;
##regex debugFST(FST4, EXPRESSIVE);
#regex FST4;
######################
######SPLIT############
#define FST5 WORDS .o. brdHandler  .o. fborderNonDet.i .o. refineZWNJ .o. splitJointWord.i;
##regex debugFST(FST5, SPLITTER);
#regex FST5;
######################
######GENERATION########
define ARMokasarFlagElim ["(" JIM MIM ")"] (->) 0;
define JaElim [ JIM ALEF] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JhaElim [ JIM HEH ALEF] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JanElim [ JIM ALEF NOON] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JatElim [ JIM ALEF TE] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JinElim [ JIM YEH NOON ] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JunElim [ JIM VAV NOON] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JjatElim [ JIM JIM ALEF TE] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define JganEilm [ JIM GAF ALEF NOON] (->) [JIM MIM EIN] || "+" _ ;
define PLsignElim JaElim .o. JhaElim .o. JanElim .o. JatElim .o. JinElim .o. JunElim .o. JjatElim .o. JganEilm;
		##define LHSelim [?* "="] (->) 0 || .#. _;
define EERAB ["ِ" | "ُ" | "َ"];
define diaElim EERAB (->) 0;
define FST6 [rawWORDS .o. brdHandler].i .o. ARMokasarFlagElim .o. PLsignElim .o. diaElim .o. aPhone;
regex FST6;
######################
